tests/data/alphabetic-after-group-bi.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet/>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="Y" />
    <sdef n="inf"  />
    <sdef n="X" />
    <sdef n="n" />
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="apar">
<e>       <p><l><s n="inf"/><s n="Y"/></l>    <r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l><s n="X"/></l>                <r><s n="X"/></r></p> <p><l>TAIL</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
</pardefs>

  <section id="main" type="standard">
<e>         <p><l>a<g><b/></g></l>	<r>te</r></p><par n="apar"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>include<s n="n"/></l>   <r>meh<s n="n"/></r></p> </e>
  </section>
</dictionary>
